District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.03

Applicability.

This subchapter applies to a transfer on death deed made before, on, or after the effective date of this subchapter by a transferor dying on or after the effective date of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606